Utah statutes.
62A-15-712.   Responsibilities of the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental
Health.
(1)  The division shall ensure that the requirements of this part are met and
applied uniformly by local mental health authorities across the state.
(2)  Because the division must, under Section 62A-15-103, contract with,
review, approve, and oversee local mental health authority plans, and withhold
funds from local mental health authorities and public and private providers
for contract noncompliance or misuse of public funds, the division shall:
(a)  require each local mental health authority to submit its plan to the
division by May 1 of each year; and
(b)  conduct an annual program audit and review of each local mental health
authority in the state, and its contract provider.
(3) (a)  The division shall:
(i)  provide a written report to the Health and Human Services Interim
Committee by July 1 of each year; and
(ii)  provide an oral report to that committee, as requested.
(b)  That report shall provide information regarding:
(i)  the annual audit and review;
(ii)  the financial expenditures of each local mental health authority and its
contract provider;
(iii)  the status of each local authority's and its contract provider's
compliance with its plan, state statutes, and with the provisions of the
contract awarded; and
(iv)  whether audit guidelines established under Subsections 62A-15-713(2)(a)
and 67-3-1(10) provide the division with sufficient criteria and assurances of
appropriate expenditures of public funds.
(4)  The annual audit and review described in Subsection (2)(b) shall, in
addition to items determined by the division to be necessary and appropriate,
include a review and determination regarding whether or not:
(a)  public funds allocated to local mental health authorities are consistent
with services rendered and outcomes reported by it or its contract provider;
and
(b)  each local mental health authority is exercising sufficient oversight and
control over public funds allocated for mental health programs and services.
(5)  The Legislature may refuse to appropriate funds to the division if the
division fails to comply with the procedures and requirements of this section.
